District of Columbia statutes.
1-207.37

Adjustments.

(a)

Subject to 31 U.S.C. § 1537, the Mayor, with the approval of the Council, and the Director of the Office of Management and Budget, is authorized and empowered to enter into an agreement or agreements concerning the manner and method by which amounts owed by the District to the United States, or by the United States to the District, shall be ascertained and paid.

(b)

The United States shall reimburse the District for necessary expenses incurred by the District in connection with assemblages, marches, and other demonstrations in the District which relate primarily to the federal government. The manner and method of ascertaining and paying the amounts needed to so reimburse the District shall be determined by agreement entered into in accordance with subsection (a) of this section.

(c)

Each officer and employee of the District required to do so by the Council shall provide a bond with such surety and in such amount as the Council may require. The premiums for all such bonds shall be paid out of appropriations for the District.

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 824, Pub. L. 93-198, title VII, § 737
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 116, 47 DCR 520

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 1-302, 1-1132.
1973 Ed., §§ 1-213c, 1-827.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-91, in subsec. (a), substituted “ 31 U.S.C. § 1537” for “§ 1-1131.1”.